Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2266.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9511(g)(1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 9511(B)(1)(II) AND (G)(1) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 9511. Allocation of proceeds.* * *(B) STATE HIGHWAY TRANSFER RESTORATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNT AND LOCAL BRIDGES.--(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE PROCEEDS DEPOSITED IN THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND PURSUANT TO THIS CHAPTER WHICH IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THREE MILLS OF THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SECTION 9502(A) (RELATING TO IMPOSITION OF TAX) SHALL BE DEPOSITED AS <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 FOLLOWS:* * *(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2017-2018 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, AS FOLLOWS:(A) [ONE AND ONE-HALF MILL] TWO AND THREE-QUARTERS MILLS SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE STATE HIGHWAY TRANSFER RESTORATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNT WITHIN THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND, WHICH ACCOUNT IS HEREBY CREATED. THE FUNDS DEPOSITED IN THE STATE HIGHWAY TRANSFER RESTORATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNT ARE HEREBY ANNUALLY APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE ACCOUNT UPON AUTHORIZATION BY THE GOVERNOR FOR EXPENDITURE AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G).(B) [ONE AND ONE-HALF] ONE-QUARTER MILL SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE HIGHWAY BRIDGE IMPROVEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT WITHIN THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND FOR LOCAL BRIDGES, NOTWITHSTANDING IF THE PROJECT IS ADMINISTERED BY A COUNTY, MUNICIPALITY OR THE DEPARTMENT.* * *(g) Use of funds in the State Highway Transfer Restoration Restricted Account.--The funds appropriated in subsection (b) for deposit in the State Highway Transfer Restoration Restricted Account shall be used to pay for the costs of restoration of such highways as provided in Chapter 92 (relating to transfer of State highways) and annual payments to the municipalities for highway maintenance in accordance with the following:(1) [Annual] Subject to paragraph (1.1), annual maintenance payments shall be at the rate of [$4,000] $6,000 per mile for each highway or portion of highway transferred 20260HB2266PN3330 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Chapter 92, section 222 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law, or any statute enacted in 1981.(1.1) Beginning February 1, 2028, the department shall make automatic adjustments to annual maintenance payments under paragraph (1) every 24 months. The following apply:(i) The automatic adjustments shall be calculated as follows:(A) The department shall determine the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for each succeeding 24-month period.(B) The percentage increase under clause (A) shall be applied to annual maintenance payments, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each highway or portion of highway transferred under:(I) section 222 of the State Highway Law; or(II) any statute enacted in 1981.(ii) The department shall transmit notice of the automatic adjustment and the calculation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2266PN3330 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324